Hawaii, session 2026, SB2369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that settlement of the Navahine F. v. Hawaiʻi Department of Transportation CIV. NO. 1CCV-24-0000269 (Hawaiʻi Cir. Ct.) case requires that the department of transportation establish a Greenhouse Gas (GHG) Reduction Plan to implement legislative requirements to achieve zero emissions by 2045 across all sectors of transportation in the State, including ground and interisland sea and air transportation modes.  Any combustion of carbon-based fuels releases greenhouse gas emissions and cannot be a legitimate part of any state GHG reduction plan; therefore, the transportation sector can only achieve zero emissions once the electric generation sector is combustion-free. The legislature additionally finds that many alternative fuels actually have worse GHG impacts than the fossil fuels they replace, rely largely on imports, and would make energy far more expensive for local residents than a transition plan based on conservation, efficiency, electrification, and combustion-free clean, renewable energy sources coupled with energy storage strategies.  It is in the best interest of state consumers, taxpayers, and ratepayers to invest public incentives into the most clean and cost-effective solutions with minimal imports and without building new infrastructure that would need to be phased out prematurely in order to complete a second major infrastructure transition by the State's 2045 targets.  Therefore, the legislature believes that further research is essential to the development of a successful approach to transitioning the State to carbon-free, renewable energy sources. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii state energy office to commission a study of various energy consumption sectors and possible avenues for effective decarbonization. SECTION 2. (a)  The Hawaii state energy office shall commission a study of the different energy consumption sectors, including electricity, transportation, and heating, to determine which sector can be most quickly and cost-effectively decarbonized through additional public investment in combustion‑free renewable energy sources. (b)  The study shall: (1)  Evaluate only: (A)  Residential, commercial and industrial sectors for electricity and heating consumption; and (B)  Ground transportation, sea and air interisland transportation, and international cargo shipping; and (2)  Include and prioritize conservation and efficiency strategies, including but not limited to storage strategies to ensure firm energy. (c) The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than December 31, 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________